Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3344
Support order payments; considered abandoned property; when; disposition.

Support order payments placed in the Title IV-D Support Payment Distributive Fund shall be exempt from the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act. If, within three years after the date of receipt, the Title IV-D Division is unable to disburse support order payments collected pursuant to law and also unable to return the collected payments to the noncustodial parent, such payments shall be considered abandoned property. This abandoned property shall be used by the state for child support enforcement as provided by the rules and regulations of the division.

Laws 1999, LB 637, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 30;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 5.

Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, see section 69-1329.